Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB946.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1329(d)(1) and (3) of Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1329. Valuation of acquired water and wastewater systems.* * *(d) Acquisitions by public utility.--The following apply:(1) If the acquiring public utility and selling utility agree to use the process outlined in subsection (a), the acquiring public utility shall include the following as an attachment to its application for commission approval of the acquisition filed pursuant to section 1102 (relating to enumeration of acts requiring certificate):(i) Copies of the two appraisals performed by the 12345678910111213141516171819 utility valuation experts under subsection (a).(ii) The purchase price of the selling utility as agreed to by the acquiring public utility and selling utility.(iii) The ratemaking rate base determined pursuant to subsection (c)(2).(iv) The transaction and closing costs incurred by the acquiring public utility that will be included in its rate base.(v) A tariff containing a rate equal to the existing rates of the selling utility at the time of the acquisition and a rate stabilization plan, if applicable to the acquisition.(vi) The results of the ratepayer referendum conducted under subsection (d.1).* * *(3) The commission shall issue an order approving or disapproving the application for acquisition. Unless the results of the ratepayer referendum under subsection (d.1) show that a majority of ratepayers approve of the proposed acquisition, the proposed acquisition shall be considered contrary to the public interest and the commission shall not approve the application for acquisition. If the commission issues an order approving the application for acquisition, the order shall include:(i) The ratemaking rate base of the selling utility, as determined under subsection (c)(2).(ii) Additional conditions of approval as may be required by the commission.* * *20250HB0946PN1013 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d.1) Ratepayer referendum.--A ratepayer referendum shall be conducted by a selling utility with a fair market value of $1,000,000 or more. The following shall apply:(1) Each ratepayer account shall be asked "Do you approve the sale of (insert selling utility) to (insert acquiring public utility or entity) for the sum of (fair market value)?".(2) At least 45 days before mailing a referendum ballot to each ratepayer account under paragraph (3), a selling utility shall notify each ratepayer account of the referendum through a mailing of no more than two pages via the United States mail at the cost of the acquiring public utility. The Office of Consumer Advocate shall develop the mailing. The acquiring public utility shall place a full page advertisement in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipalities served by the selling utility and may additionally notify ratepayers of the referendum via electronic mail, a publicly accessible Internet website or any other method of communication. Each notice under this paragraph shall at least contain, in plain language, the maximum possible impact on a ratepayer account's utility rates, fees or surcharges as a result of the acquisition.(3) The selling utility shall mail each ratepayer account, on a date determined by the selling utility, a referendum ballot in a clearly marked envelope and provide instructions on how a ratepayer may vote either via paper ballot or a secure publicly accessible Internet website. A failure to respond by a ratepayer account shall be deemed a disapproval of the sale by the ratepayer account. Each ballot under this paragraph shall contain, in plain language, the 20250HB0946PN1013 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 maximum possible impact on a ratepayer account's utility rates, fees or surcharges as a result of the acquisition. A failure to include the maximum possible impact on a ratepayer account's utility rates, fees or surcharges on a ballot as required under this paragraph or the inclusion of inaccurate impact data on a ballot shall render the ballot insufficient for purposes of this subsection.(4) The selling utility shall provide clear instructions as to the deadline by which ballots must be postmarked via United States mail or received via a secure publicly accessible Internet website, except that under no circumstances shall less than 30 days elapse between the date the ballots are mailed and the deadline.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0946PN1013 - 4 - 123456789101112131415